Utah statutes.
58-24b-305.   License denial -- Discipline -- Cease and desist order.

In accordance with Section 58-1-401, the division may:

(1)  refuse to issue a license to an applicant;

(2)  refuse to renew a license;

(3)  revoke, suspend, or restrict a license;

(4)  place a license on probation;

(5)  issue a public or private reprimand to a licensee; or

(6)  issue a cease and desist order.

